Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Chapter 16 Members of Congress
2-16-103. Composition of state congressional districts.

All census descriptions, counties, voting districts (VTDs), tracts, blocks, census delineations, census district lines and other census designations are those established for or by the United States department of commerce, bureau of the census, for taking the 2010 federal decennial census in Tennessee as contained in the automated geographic database, known as the TIGER (topologically integrated geographic encoding and referencing) system.

As provided in subsection (b), each district is described county by county in alphabetical order and, if a county is split, by the portion of such split county. Split counties are described by VTDs and, if further divided, by census blocks.

The state of Tennessee is divided into the following nine (9) congressional districts composed as follows:

District 1:

Carter County

Cocke County

Greene County

Hamblen County

Hancock County

Hawkins County

Jefferson County

VTD: 03 White Pine School

Blocks (070100): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 3059 3060 3061 3062 3063 3064 3065 3066 3067 3068 3069 3070 3071 3072 3073 3074 3075 3076 3077 3078 3079 3080 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036 4037 4038 4039 4040 4041 4042 4043 4044 4045 4046 4047 4048 4049 4050 4051 4052 4053 4054 4055 4056 4057 4058 4059 4060 4061 4062 4063 4064 4065 5000 5001 5002 5003 5004 5005 5006 5007 5008 5009 5010 5011 5012 5013 5014 5015 5016 5017 5018 5019 5020 5021 5022 5023 5024 5025 5026 5027 5028 5029 5030 5031 5032 5033 5034 5035 5036 5037 5038 5039 5040 5041 5042 5043 5044 5045 5046 5047 5048 5049 5050 5051 5052 5053 5054 5055 5056 5057 5058 5059 5060 5061 5062 5063 5064 5065 5066 5067 5068 5069 5070

Blocks (070200): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2033 2034 2038 2039 2050 2051 2052 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2074 2076 2085

Blocks (070700): 1000 1001 1002 1003 2013 2017 2018 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2072

Blocks (070900): 1008 1009

VTD: 09 Talbott School

Blocks (070200): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 2023 2029 2030 2031 2032 2035 2036 2037 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2047 2048 2049 2053 2067 2068 2075 3000 3001 3002 3003 3005 3006 3009 3010 3011 3015 3016 3017 3026 3027 3034 3035 3037 3038 3039 3040 3048 3049

Johnson County

Sevier County

Sullivan County

Unicoi County

Washington County

District 2:

Blount County

Campbell County

VTD: Habersham

Blocks (950100): 2032

VTD: Jellico

VTD: Newcomb

VTD: Well Springs

Blocks (950800): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1028 1032 1035 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2027 2028 2029 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2072 2073

VTD: White Oak

Claiborne County

Grainger County

Jefferson County

VTD: 01 Dandridge Elementary

VTD: 02 Piedmont

VTD: 03 White Pine School

Blocks (070700): 2009 2073 2074

VTD: 04 Jefferson Elementary

VTD: 05 Jefferson Middle

VTD: 06 Rush Strong School

VTD: 07 New Market City Hall

VTD: 08 Chestnut Hill School

VTD: 08 Old Swannsylvania School

VTD: 09 Talbott School

Blocks (070200): 2046 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2077 2078 2079 2080 2081 2082 2083 2084 3004 3007 3008 3012 3013 3014 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3036 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3050 3051 3052 3053

Blocks (070600): 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2055

Blocks (070700): 2000 2001 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2024 2026

VTD: 10 Jefferson City Fire Department

Knox County

Loudon County

District 3:

Anderson County

Bradley County

VTD: 202-1 Charleston

Blocks (011100): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1020 1021 1023 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067

VTD: 302-1 Senior Center

Blocks (010300): 2008 2009

Blocks (011100): 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4033 4034 4035 4036 4058 4064

VTD: 401 Oak Grove

Blocks (010900): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043

Blocks (011601): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069

VTD: 402 Michigan Avenue

Blocks (010300): 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028

Blocks (011100): 1025 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2038 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 3059 3060 3061 3062 3063 3064 3065 3066 3067 3068 3069 3070 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4043 4044 4046 4047 4049 4050 4051 4052 4053 4054 4055 4056 4057 4059 4060 4061 4062 4063 4065 4066

VTD: 501-1 T.C. Bower

Blocks (010900): 2000 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2020 2034 2035 2036 2044

VTD: 601-1 Valley View

VTD: 602-1 Blue Spring

Blocks (011500): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3025 3026 3027 3028 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3046 3047 3048 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 3059 3060 3061 3062 3063 3064 3065 3067 3068 3069 3070 3071 3072 4004 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4037 4038 4039 4040 4041 4042 4043 4044 4045 4046 4047 4048 4049 4050 4051 4052 4053 4054 4055 4056 4057 4058 4059 4060 4061 4062 4063 4064 4065 4066 4067 4068 4069 4070 4071 4072 4073 4074 4075 4076 4077 4078 4079 4080 4081 4082 4083 4084 4085 4086 4087 4088 4089 4090 4091 4092 4093 4094 4095 4096 4097 4098 4099 4100 4101 4102 4103 4104 4105 4107

VTD: 603-1 Waterville

Blocks (010900): 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064

Blocks (011500): 4000 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036

Blocks (011602): 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016

VTD: 604-1 Black Fox

Blocks (011500): 2009 2010 2011 2012 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2077 2078 2079 2080 2081 2082 2083 2084 2085 2086 2087 2088 2089 2090 2091 2092 2093 2094 2097 2098 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3029 3030 3031 3032 3044 3045 3049 3050 3051 3066

Campbell County

VTD: Caryville

VTD: Clinchmore

VTD: College Hill

VTD: Coolidge

VTD: Davis Chapel

VTD: Demory

VTD: East LaFollette

VTD: Elk Valley

VTD: Firehall

VTD: Habersham

Blocks (950100): 1031 1052 1054 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 1102 1103 1104 1105 1106 1107 1108 1109 1110 1111 1112 1113 1114 1115 1116 1117 1118 1119 1120 1121 1122 1123 1124 1125 1126 1127 1128 1130 1133 1138 1139 1140 1141 1143 1144 1145 1146 1147 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2056 2064 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3058 3059 3060 3061 3062 3063 3064 3065 3066 3067 3068 3069 3070 3071 3072 3073 3074 3075 3076 3077 3078 3079 3084 3086 3087 3088 3090 3091 3094 3095 3096 3097 3101 3102 3135 3136 3137 3138

Blocks (950300): 2041 2045 2048 2049 2130 2131

VTD: Jacksboro

VTD: Jacksboro Station

VTD: Jr. High

VTD: Pinecrest

VTD: Ridgewood

VTD: Valley View

VTD: Well Springs

Blocks (950800): 1034 1055

Blocks (950900): 1028 1029

VTD: West LaFollette

Hamilton County

McMinn County

Monroe County

Morgan County

Polk County

Roane County

Scott County

Union County

District 4:

Bedford County

Bledsoe County

Bradley County

VTD: 101-1 McDonald

VTD: 102-1 Prospect

VTD: 103-1 Hopewell

VTD: 201-1 E.L. Ross

VTD: 202-1 Charleston

Blocks (011100): 1017 1018 1019 1022 1024 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1035 1036 1102 1104

Blocks (011201): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 1102 1103 1104 1105 1106 1107 1108 1109 1110 1111 1112 1113 1114 1115 1116 1117 1118 1119 1120 1121 1122 1123 1124 1125 1126 1127 1128 1129 1130 1131 1132 1133 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2023 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2045 2046 2047 2058

Blocks (011202): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1084 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2045

VTD: 301-1 Lee University

VTD: 302-1 Senior Center

Blocks (010100): 4009 4014 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036 4042 4043 4044

Blocks (010200): 1017 1018 1019 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2048 2049 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3030 3033 3034 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 3059 3060

Blocks (010300): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2010 2011

Blocks (011100): 2010 2011 2012 2037 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4037 4038 4039 4040 4041 4042 4045 4048

Blocks (011201): 3055 3056 3057 3058 3065 3067 3068

VTD: 401 Oak Grove

Blocks (010800): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2011 2012 2013 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2029 2030 2033 2035 2036 2037 3006

VTD: 402 Michigan Avenue

Blocks (010300): 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1052

Blocks (011100): 1045 2013

VTD: 501-1 T.C. Bower

Blocks (010700): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 4002 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036 4037

Blocks (010800): 3003 3004 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024

Blocks (010900): 2001 2019 2021 2022 2023 2024

Blocks (011000): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2031 2032 2033 2034 2041 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024

Blocks (011500): 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1030 1031 1040 1041 1042 1046 1047 1048 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1070 1071 1081 1103 1104

VTD: 502-1 Community Serv

VTD: 602-1 Blue Spring

Blocks (011500): 1054 1055 1057 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1082 1083 1084 1088 4002 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4018 4106

VTD: 603-1 Waterville

Blocks (011000): 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 3005 3025 3026 3027

Blocks (011500): 4001 4003

VTD: 604-1 Black Fox

Blocks (011500): 1027 1028 1029 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1043 1044 1045 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1056 1069 1085 1086 1087 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 1102 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2041 2042 2095 2096

VTD: 701 Stuart

VTD: 702 Cleveland High

Franklin County

Grundy County

Lincoln County

Marion County

Marshall County

Maury County

VTD: Bear Creek

VTD: Bigbyville

VTD: College Hill

Blocks (010500): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 3012 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 3059 3060 3061 3062 3064 3065 3066 3067 3068 3092 3093 3094 3095 3096 3097 3098 3099 3100 3101 3102 3103 3104 3105 3106 3107 3108 3109 3110 3111 3112 3113 3114 3115 3116 3124 3125 3126 3127 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 5000 5001 5002 5003 5004 5005 5006 5007 5008 5009 5010 5011 5012 5013 5014 5015 5016 5017

Blocks (010600): 4013 4014 4021 4022 4023

Blocks (011102): 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1015 1016 1020 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2014 2016 2017 2018 2019 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2034 2035 2036

VTD: CP Church

VTD: Culleoka

VTD: First Family

VTD: Highland

Blocks (010600): 4038 4039 4043

Blocks (010700): 1017 1018 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2025 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036 4037 4038 4039 5000 5001 5002 5003 5004 5005 5006 5007 5008 5009 5010 5011 5012 5013 5014 5015 5016 5017 5018 5019 5020

Blocks (011101): 2000 2005 2006 2007 2008 2012 2014 2015 2018 2020 2021 2033 2043 2044 2045 2049

Blocks (011102): 2013

VTD: Mt. Pleasant

VTD: Pleasant Heights

VTD: Porters Chapel

VTD: Rally Hill

VTD: Riverside

VTD: Spring Hill

VTD: St. Catherine

Blocks (010801): 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1034 1035 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048

Blocks (010802): 2022 2026 2029 2053 2054 2055 2056 2078 2079 2080 2094 2095 2096 2100

Blocks (011002): 1000 1001 1007 1008

VTD: Tradewinds

Blocks (010801): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1036 1037 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043

VTD: West End

Blocks (010600): 4046

Meigs County

Moore County

Rhea County

Rutherford County

Sequatchie County

Van Buren County

VTD: Cedar Grove Community Cntr.

VTD: Cummingsville Community Cntr.

Blocks (925000): 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028

Blocks (925200): 1026 1028 2014 2019 2027 2028 2030 2031 2122 2123

VTD: Fall Creek Falls Comm. Center

VTD: Piney Fire Hall

VTD: Spencer 5

VTD: Spencer Elem. School

VTD: White Hill Community Cntr.

Warren County

District 5:

Cheatham County

VTD: 1-1 Cheatham Co. Library - Ashland City

VTD: 2-2 East Cheatham Elem. School

Blocks (070102): 2000 2001 2003 2004 2013

Blocks (070104): 1010 1011 1012 1019 1020

VTD: 3-1 Pleasant View City Hall

Blocks (070201): 1101

Blocks (070202): 1008 1009 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1020 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2021 2022 2024 2031 2036 2039 2040 2042 2043 2044 2045 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067

Blocks (070203): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1051

VTD: 4-1 West Cheatham Elem. School

VTD: 4-2 New Hope Community Center

VTD: 4-3 Sycamore Middle School

VTD: 5-1 Two Rivers Fire Hall

VTD: 5-2 Pegram City Hall

VTD: 6-1 Harpeth High School

Davidson County

Dickson County

District 6:

Cannon County

Cheatham County

VTD: 2-2 East Cheatham Elem. School

Blocks (070102): 2002

Blocks (070103): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044

Blocks (070104): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1021 1022 1023 1024 2000 2001 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006

VTD: 3-1 Pleasant View City Hall

Blocks (070201): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1102 1103 1104 1105 1106 1107 1108 1109

Blocks (070202): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1010 1018 1019 2041

Clay County

Coffee County

Cumberland County

DeKalb County

Fentress County

Jackson County

Macon County

Overton County

Pickett County

Putnam County

Robertson County

Smith County

Sumner County

Trousdale County

Van Buren County

VTD: Cummingsville Community Cntr.

Blocks (925000): 2021

Blocks (925200): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1027 1126 1127 1128 1129 1130 1131 1132 1133 1135 1136 1137 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2015 2016 2017 2018

White County

Wilson County

District 7:

Benton County

VTD: 1 Holladay School

VTD: 2 Camden High School

VTD: 3 Benton Co. Courthouse

VTD: 4 Camden Elementary School

VTD: 5 Benton Co. Courthouse

VTD: 6 Big Sandy School

Blocks (963000): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1040 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1057 1058 1060 1061 1063 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 1102 1103 1104 1105 1106 1107 1108 1109 1110 1111 1112 1113 1114 1115 1116 1117 1118 1119 1120 1121 1122 1123 1124 1125 1126 1127 1128 1129 1130 1131 1132 1133 1134 1135 1136 1137 1138 1139 1140 1141 1142 1143 1144 1145 1146 1147 1148 1149 1150 1151 1152 1153 1154 1155 1156 1157 1158 1159 1160 1161 1162 1163 1164 1165 1166 1167 1168 1169 1170 1171 1172 1173 1174 1175 1177 1178 1179 1180 1181 1182 1183 1184 1185 1186 1187 1188 1189 1190 1191 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2078 2079 2081 2082 2083 2084 2085 2086 2087 2088 2089 2090 2096 2097 2098 2099 2100 2119 2120 2121 2122 2123 2124 2125 2126 2127 2128 2129 2130 2131 2132 2133 2134 2135 2136 2137 2138 2139 2140 2141 2145

Chester County

Decatur County

Giles County

Hardeman County

Hardin County

Henderson County

Hickman County

Houston County

Humphreys County

Lawrence County

Lewis County

Maury County

VTD: Armory

VTD: Baker

VTD: College Hill

Blocks (010600): 2000 2001 2003 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4007 4008

VTD: Hampshire

VTD: Highland

Blocks (010700): 1004 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1014 1015 1016 1020 1021 1022 1023 2001 2004 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2024 4002 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014

VTD: Santa Fe

VTD: St. Catherine

Blocks (010100): 3102 3112 3113 3150

Blocks (010802): 1088 1089 1090 1091 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1101 1102 1103 1104 1105 1106 1107 1108 1109 1114 1115 1145 1147 1148 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2021 2027 2028 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2088 2091 2092 2093 2098 2099 2101 2102 2103

Blocks (010900): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1083 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 1102 1103 1104 1105 1106 1107 1108 1109 1110 1111 1112 1113 1114 1115 1116 1117 1118 1119 1120 1122 1123 1124 1125 1126 1127 1130 1131 1132 1133

Blocks (011001): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2037 2038 2039 2044 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2061 2062 2063 2074 2075 2100 2101

VTD: Theta

VTD: Tradewinds

Blocks (010700): 1002 1003 1005 2000 2002 2003 2005 2006

Blocks (010801): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004

VTD: West End

Blocks (010600): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 2002 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 4006 4009 4010 4011 4012 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036 4037 4040 4041 4042 4044 4045 4047 5000 5001 5002 5003 5004 5005 5006 5007 5008 5009 5010 5011 5012 5013 5014 5015 5016 5017 5018 5019 5020 5021 5022 5023 5024 5025 5026 5027 5028 5029 5030

Blocks (010700): 1000 1001 1011 1012 1013 1019 4000 4001 4003 4004 4005 4006

Blocks (010802): 1042

McNairy County

Montgomery County

Perry County

Stewart County

Wayne County

Williamson County

District 8:

Benton County

VTD: 6 Big Sandy School

Blocks (963000): 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1056 1059 1062 1064 1176

Carroll County

Crockett County

Dyer County

Fayette County

Gibson County

Haywood County

Henry County

Lake County

Lauderdale County

Madison County

Obion County

Shelby County

VTD: ARL-01

VTD: ARL-02

VTD: Bartlett 02

VTD: Bartlett 03

VTD: Bartlett 04

VTD: Bartlett 05

Blocks (020632): 1001 1003 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1053 1054 2000 2001 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010

Blocks (020832): 1015 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1066 1067 1068 1071 1072 1073 1075

VTD: Bartlett 06

VTD: Bartlett 08

VTD: Bartlett 09

VTD: Bartlett 11

VTD: Bartlett 12

VTD: Bartlett 13

VTD: Bartlett 14

Blocks (020222): 1040

Blocks (020531): 2000 2001 2002 2007 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3038 3039 3041

Blocks (020644): 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1037 1038 1039 1040 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2038 2039 2042 2043 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3012 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018

VTD: Brunswick 1

Blocks (020831): 2000

Blocks (020832): 1002 1003 1004 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1016 1017 1018 1019 1050 1051 1052 1053 1063 1064 1065 3000 3001 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3031

Blocks (021113): 2000

Blocks (021142): 1007

VTD: Brunswick 2

VTD: Collierville 09

VTD: Collierville 1

VTD: Collierville 2

VTD: Collierville 3

VTD: Collierville 4

VTD: Collierville 5

VTD: Collierville 6

VTD: Collierville 7

VTD: Cordova 6

Blocks (021113): 2034

Blocks (021142): 1005 1008

VTD: Cordova 9

Blocks (021139): 1005 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023

Blocks (021140): 1047

VTD: Eads

VTD: Forest Hills 1

Blocks (021341): 2038

Blocks (021342): 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4069 4070 4071 4074 4075 4076 4077 4078 4079 4080 4081 4082

Blocks (021520): 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033

VTD: Forest Hills 2

Blocks (021510): 2000 2002 2003

Blocks (021520): 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1064 1065 1066 1067 2162 2163 2164 2165 2166 2167 2220 2221

VTD: Germantown 01

VTD: Germantown 02

VTD: Germantown 03

VTD: Germantown 04

VTD: Germantown 05

VTD: Germantown 06

Blocks (021341): 1006 1020

Blocks (021342): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1031 1032 1034 1035 2003 2004 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 3000 3001 3002 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3022 3023 3024 3025 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3036 4033 4034 4035 4036 4037 4038 4039 4040 4041 4042 4043 4044 4045 4046 4047 4048 4049 4050 4051 4052 4053 4058 4059 4060 4061 4062 4072 4073

VTD: Germantown 08

VTD: Germantown 09

VTD: Germantown 10

VTD: Germantown 11

VTD: Germantown 12

VTD: Kerrville

Blocks (020210): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2013 2018 2019 2020 2022 2032 2064 3000

Blocks (020700): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1021 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005

Blocks (020810): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1047

VTD: Lakeland 1

VTD: Lakeland 2

Blocks (020831): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2015 2016 2017 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015

Blocks (021142): 1006

VTD: Memphis 44-3

Blocks (002900): 5000 5001 5002 5003 5004 5015 5017 5018

Blocks (007300): 1000 1001

VTD: Memphis 46-1

Blocks (007300): 3000

VTD: Memphis 55-1

Blocks (008600): 1028 1029 1030 1031 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025

VTD: Memphis 55-2

VTD: Memphis 56-1

VTD: Memphis 57

VTD: Memphis 63-2

Blocks (009200): 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015

VTD: Memphis 64

VTD: Memphis 68-1

Blocks (009200): 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3045 3047 3048 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 5012 5013 5014 5015 5017 5018 5019 5020 5021 5022 5023 5024 5029 5030

VTD: Memphis 68-2

VTD: Memphis 68-3

VTD: Memphis 80-2

VTD: Memphis 81-1

VTD: Memphis 81-3

Blocks (021320): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032

Blocks (021331): 1000 1001 1002 1011 1012

Blocks (021333): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2007

Blocks (021430): 2015 2016

VTD: Memphis 81-4

VTD: Memphis 81-6

Blocks (021320): 3000 3001

VTD: Memphis 87-3

Blocks (020644): 3011

VTD: Morning Sun 01

Blocks (021010): 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1048 1049 1050 1051 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1078 1102 1103 1117 1118 1119

VTD: Morning Sun 02

VTD: Stewartville

Blocks (020210): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004

Blocks (020222): 1000 1001 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012

Blocks (020644): 1000

Blocks (020700): 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021

Blocks (020810): 1024 1025 1026 1027 1038 1039 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042

Blocks (020820): 1000

Tipton County

Weakley County

District 9:

Shelby County

VTD: Bartlett 05

Blocks (020632): 1050 1051 1052

Blocks (020832): 1061 1069 1070

Blocks (021113): 2002

VTD: Bartlett 10

VTD: Bartlett 14

Blocks (020531): 3021 3042

Blocks (020532): 3000 3031 4000 4001 4002

VTD: Brunswick 1

Blocks (020832): 1062

Blocks (021113): 2001

VTD: Capleville 1

VTD: Capleville 5

VTD: Cordova 10

VTD: Cordova 3

VTD: Cordova 4

VTD: Cordova 5

VTD: Cordova 6

Blocks (021113): 2003 2004 2005 2006 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2039 2040 2041 2050

Blocks (021141): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021

Blocks (021142): 1000 1001 1003 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088

VTD: Cordova 9

Blocks (021139): 1024

Blocks (021140): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046

VTD: Forest Hills 1

Blocks (021342): 4026

Blocks (021510): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1018 1019 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1042 1043

VTD: Forest Hills 2

Blocks (021510): 1020 1030 2001 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071

VTD: Germantown 06

Blocks (021342): 3018 3019 3020 3021 3026 3033 3034 3035 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 3059 3060 3061 3062 3063 3064 3065 3066 3067 3068 3069 3070 3071 3072 3073 3074 3075 3076 3077 3078 3079 3080 3081 3082 3083 3084 3085 3086 3087 4054 4055 4056 4057 4063 4064 4065 4066 4067 4068

Blocks (021510): 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1040 1041 1044 1045 1046 1047

VTD: Kerrville

Blocks (020210): 2009 2010 2012 2014 2016 2017 2021 3001

VTD: Lakeland 2

Blocks (020831): 2014

Blocks (021142): 1002 1004

VTD: Locke

VTD: Lucy 1

VTD: Lucy 2

VTD: Lucy 3

VTD: McConnell's

VTD: Memphis 01

VTD: Memphis 02

VTD: Memphis 11

VTD: Memphis 12

VTD: Memphis 13

VTD: Memphis 15

VTD: Memphis 16-1

VTD: Memphis 17

VTD: Memphis 20-1

VTD: Memphis 20-3

VTD: Memphis 21

VTD: Memphis 22

VTD: Memphis 25-2

VTD: Memphis 26-1

VTD: Memphis 27

VTD: Memphis 28

VTD: Memphis 29-1

VTD: Memphis 29-2

VTD: Memphis 31-1

VTD: Memphis 31-2

VTD: Memphis 31-4

VTD: Memphis 32

VTD: Memphis 33

VTD: Memphis 34-2

VTD: Memphis 35-1

VTD: Memphis 36-1

VTD: Memphis 36-2

VTD: Memphis 36-3

VTD: Memphis 37

VTD: Memphis 38-2

VTD: Memphis 40-1

VTD: Memphis 40-2

VTD: Memphis 41-1

VTD: Memphis 41-3

VTD: Memphis 42-1

VTD: Memphis 43-2

VTD: Memphis 44-1

VTD: Memphis 44-2

VTD: Memphis 44-3

Blocks (002900): 5005 5006 5007 5008 5009 5010 5011 5012 5013 5014 5016

Blocks (007300): 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018

VTD: Memphis 44-4

VTD: Memphis 44-5

VTD: Memphis 45-1

VTD: Memphis 45-2

VTD: Memphis 45-4

VTD: Memphis 46-1

Blocks (007300): 2000 2001 2002 2003 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018

VTD: Memphis 46-2

VTD: Memphis 47-1

VTD: Memphis 48

VTD: Memphis 49

VTD: Memphis 50-1

VTD: Memphis 52-1

VTD: Memphis 52-2

VTD: Memphis 52-3

VTD: Memphis 53-1

VTD: Memphis 53-2

VTD: Memphis 53-3

VTD: Memphis 54

VTD: Memphis 55-1

Blocks (008600): 1019 1020 1021 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 2026 2030 2031

VTD: Memphis 56-3

VTD: Memphis 58-1

VTD: Memphis 58-4

VTD: Memphis 59-1

VTD: Memphis 59-5

VTD: Memphis 60-1

VTD: Memphis 60-2

VTD: Memphis 60-3

VTD: Memphis 60-4

VTD: Memphis 60-5

VTD: Memphis 60-6

VTD: Memphis 60-7

VTD: Memphis 60-8

VTD: Memphis 60-9

VTD: Memphis 61

VTD: Memphis 62-0

VTD: Memphis 63-2

Blocks (008600): 3000 3001 3012 3013 3014

Blocks (009200): 2000 2001 2002 2004 2005 2006

Blocks (009800): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021

VTD: Memphis 65-1

VTD: Memphis 66

VTD: Memphis 67-1

VTD: Memphis 67-3

VTD: Memphis 68-1

Blocks (009200): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3044

Blocks (021122): 2011 2012 2013 2014 2018 2019

Blocks (021200): 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1015 1016 1017 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006

Blocks (980400): 1006 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1018 1044 1047 1048 1049

VTD: Memphis 69-1

VTD: Memphis 69-2

VTD: Memphis 70-1

VTD: Memphis 70-2

VTD: Memphis 70-3

VTD: Memphis 71-3

VTD: Memphis 71-4

VTD: Memphis 71-5

VTD: Memphis 72-1

VTD: Memphis 72-3

VTD: Memphis 72-5

VTD: Memphis 72-7

VTD: Memphis 73-1

VTD: Memphis 73-3

VTD: Memphis 73-4

VTD: Memphis 74-1

VTD: Memphis 74-2

VTD: Memphis 74-4

VTD: Memphis 74-5

VTD: Memphis 74-6

VTD: Memphis 74-9

VTD: Memphis 75-1

VTD: Memphis 75-11

VTD: Memphis 75-5

VTD: Memphis 75-6

VTD: Memphis 75-7

VTD: Memphis 76-4

VTD: Memphis 76-5

VTD: Memphis 76-6

VTD: Memphis 77-1

VTD: Memphis 77-2

VTD: Memphis 77-3

VTD: Memphis 78-1

VTD: Memphis 78-3

VTD: Memphis 79-1

VTD: Memphis 79-2

VTD: Memphis 79-3

VTD: Memphis 79-7

VTD: Memphis 79-8

VTD: Memphis 81-2

VTD: Memphis 81-3

Blocks (021331): 1013

VTD: Memphis 81-5

VTD: Memphis 81-6

Blocks (021320): 3008 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3026 3027

VTD: Memphis 81-7

VTD: Memphis 82-1

VTD: Memphis 82-2

VTD: Memphis 82-3

VTD: Memphis 83

VTD: Memphis 84-1

VTD: Memphis 84-2

VTD: Memphis 86

VTD: Memphis 87-1

VTD: Memphis 87-3

Blocks (020644): 3010 3013 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031

Blocks (020651): 1004 1005 1024 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 5000 5001 5002 5003 5004 5005 5006 5007 5008 5009 5010 5011 5012 5013 5014 5015 5016 5017 5018 5019 5020

VTD: Memphis 88-2

VTD: Memphis 88-3

VTD: Memphis 88-4

VTD: Memphis 88-5

VTD: Memphis 89-1

VTD: Memphis 89-2

VTD: Memphis 90-1

VTD: Memphis 90-2

VTD: Memphis 90-3

VTD: Memphis 91-1

VTD: Memphis 91-2

VTD: Memphis 91-3

VTD: Memphis 92-1

VTD: Memphis 92-2

VTD: Memphis 93-1

VTD: Memphis 93-2

VTD: Memphis 93-3

VTD: Memphis 94-2

VTD: Memphis 94-3

VTD: Memphis 94-5

VTD: Memphis 94-7

VTD: Memphis 94-8

VTD: Memphis 95-1

VTD: Memphis 95-2

VTD: Memphis 95-3

VTD: Memphis 95-5

VTD: Memphis 95-6
